North Dakota, session 69, SB2298.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Subdivision b of subsection 4 of section 15.1-27-04.1 of the
North Dakota Century Code, as effective through June 30, 2025, is amended and reenacted as
follows:
b. Subtract an amount equal to seventy-five percent of all revenue types listed in
subdivisionssubdivision c and paragraphs 1 and 2 of subdivision d of
subsection 1 and revenue from payments in lieu of taxes. Before determining the
deduction for seventy-five percent of all revenue types, the superintendent of
public instruction shall adjust revenues as follows:
(1) Tuition revenue shall be adjusted as follows:
(a) In addition to deducting tuition revenue received specifically for the
operation of an educational program provided at a residential
treatment facility, tuition revenue received for the provision of an adult
farm management program, tuition received for the education of
Page No. 1 25.0789.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
high-cost and special education students, and tuition received under
an agreement to educate students from a school district on an
air force base with funding received through federal impact aid as
directed each school year in paragraph 3 of subdivision c of
subsection 1, the superintendent of public instruction also shall reduce
the total tuition reported by the school district by the amount of tuition
revenue received for the education of students not residing in the
state and for which the state has not entered a cross-border education
contract; and
(b) The superintendent of public instruction also shall reduce the total
tuition reported by admitting school districts meeting the requirements
of subdivision e of subsection 2 of section 15.1-29-12 by the amount
of tuition revenue received for the education of students residing in an
adjacent school district.
(2) After adjusting tuition revenue as provided in paragraph 1, the
superintendent shall reduce all remaining revenues from all revenue types
by the percentage of mills levied in 2022 by the school district for sinking
and interest relative to the total mills levied in 2022 by the school district for
all purposes.
SECTION 2. AMENDMENT. Subdivision b of subsection 4 of section 15.1-27-04.1 of the
North Dakota Century Code, as effective after June 30, 2025, is amended and reenacted as
follows:
b. Subtract an amount equal to seventy-five percent of all revenue types listed in
subdivisionssubdivision c and paragraphs 1 and 2 of subdivision d of
subsection 1 and revenue from payments in lieu of taxes. Before determining the
deduction for seventy-five percent of all revenue types, the superintendent of
public instruction shall adjust revenues as follows:
(1) Tuition revenue shall be adjusted as follows:
(a) In addition to deducting tuition revenue received specifically for the
operation of an educational program provided at a residential
treatment facility, tuition revenue received for the provision of an adult
Page No. 2 25.0789.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
farm management program, tuition received for the education of
high-cost and special education students, and tuition received under
an agreement to educate students from a school district on an
air force base with funding received through federal impact aid as
directed each school year in paragraph 3 of subdivision c of
subsection 1, the superintendent of public instruction also shall reduce
the total tuition reported by the school district by the amount of tuition
revenue received for the education of students not residing in the
state and for which the state has not entered a cross-border education
contract; and
(b) The superintendent of public instruction also shall reduce the total
tuition reported by admitting school districts meeting the requirements
of subdivision e of subsection 2 of section 15.1-29-12 by the amount
of tuition revenue received for the education of students residing in an
adjacent school district.
(2) After adjusting tuition revenue as provided in paragraph 1, the
superintendent shall reduce all remaining revenues from all revenue types
by the percentage of mills levied in 2022 by the school district for sinking
and interest relative to the total mills levied in 2022 by the school district for
all purposes.
SECTION 3. AMENDMENT. Subsection 26 of section 57-02-08 of the North Dakota
Century Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
26. a. Fixtures, buildings, and improvements when owned and occupied as a
homestead, as hereinafter defined, by a paraplegic disabled personindividual, or
if the personindividual is deceased the unremarried spouse, if the income from all
sources of the personindividual and spouse, or if the personindividual is
deceased the income from all sources of the unremarried surviving spouse, in the
calendar year prior to the year for which the exemption is claimed did not exceed
the maximum amount of income provided in section 57-02-08.1 for receiving a
homestead credit under that sectionseventy thousand dollars.
Page No. 3 25.0789.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
b. To obtain the exemption for the first time, a certificate from a medical doctor who
is approved by the board of county commissioners, accompanied by an affidavit,
showing the facts herein required and a description of the property, must be filed
with the county auditor. The affidavit and accompanying certificate must be
opened to public inspection. Any personindividual claiming the exemption for any
year after the first year shall furnish to the assessor or other assessment officials
when requested to do so any information which the personindividual believes will
support the claim for the exemption for any subsequent year.
c. For purposes of this subsection, "homestead" has the meaning provided:
(1) "Dependent" has the same meaning it has for federal income tax purposes.
(2) "Homestead" means a homestead as described in section 47-18-01 except
that it also applies to any personindividual who otherwise qualifies under the
provisions of this subsection whether or not the personindividual is the head
of a family.
(3) "Income" means income for the most recent complete taxable year from all
sources, including the income of any dependent of the applicant, and
including any county, state, or federal public assistance benefits, social
security, or other retirement benefits, but excluding any federal rent subsidy,
any amount excluded from income by federal or state law with the exception
of income from social security benefits, and medical expenses paid during
the year by the applicant or the applicant's dependent which is not
compensated by insurance or other means.
(4) "Medical expenses" has the same meaning as it has for state income tax
purposes, except that for transportation for medical care the individual may
use the standard mileage rate allowed for state officer and employee use of
a motor vehicle under section 54 - 06 - 09 .
d. The board of county commissioners is hereby authorized tomay cancel the
unpaid taxes for any year in which the personindividual has held title to the
exempt property.
SECTION 4. AMENDMENT. Section 57-02-08.1 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
Page No. 4 25.0789.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
57-02-08.1. Homestead creditrenter refund.
1. a. Any person sixty-five years of age or older or permanently and totally disabled, in
the year in which the tax was levied, with an income that does not exceed the
limitations of subdivision c is entitled to receive a reduction in the assessment on
the taxable valuation on the person's homestead. An exemption under this
subsection applies regardless of whether the person is the head of a family.
b. The exemption under this subsection continues to apply if the person does not
reside in the homestead and the person's absence is due to confinement in a
nursing home, hospital, or other care facility, for as long as the portion of the
homestead previously occupied by the person is not rented to another person.
c. The exemption must be determined according to the following schedule:
(1) If the person's income is not in excess of forty thousand dollars, a reduction
of one hundred percent of the taxable valuation of the person's homestead
up to a maximum reduction of nine thousand dollars of taxable valuation.
(2) If the person's income is in excess of forty thousand dollars and not in
excess of seventy thousand dollars, a reduction of fifty percent of the
taxable valuation of the person's homestead up to a maximum reduction of
four thousand five hundred dollars of taxable valuation.
d. Persons residing together, as spouses or when one or more is a dependent of
another, are entitled to only one exemption between or among them under this
subsection. Persons residing together, who are not spouses or dependents, who
are co-owners of the property are each entitled to a percentage of a full
exemption under this subsection equal to their ownership interests in the
property.
e. This subsection does not reduce the liability of any person for special
assessments levied upon any property.
f. Any person claiming the exemption under this subsection shall sign a verified
statement of facts establishing the person's eligibility. Any income information
contained in the statement of facts is a confidential record.
g. The assessor shall attach the statement filed under subdivision f to the
assessment sheet and shall show the reduction on the assessment sheet.
Page No. 5 25.0789.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
h. An exemption under this subsection terminates at the end of the taxable year of
the death of the applicant.
2. a. Any person who would qualify for an exemption under subdivisions a and c of
subsection 1 except for the fact that the person rents living quartersAn individual
sixty - five years of age or older or permanently and totally disabled with an
income not in excess of seventy thousand dollars is eligible for refund of a portion
of the person'sindividual's annual rent deemed by this subsection to constitute
the payment of property tax for the individual's rental homestead. A refund under
this section applies regardless of whether the individual is the head of a family.
b. For the purpose of this subsection, twenty percent of the annual rent, exclusive of
any federal rent subsidy and of charges for any utilities, services, furniture,
furnishings, or personal property appliances furnished by the landlord as part of
the rental agreement, whether expressly set out in the rental agreement, must be
considered as payment made for property tax. When any part of the twenty
percent of the annual rent exceeds four percent of the annual income of a
qualified applicant, the applicant is entitled to receive a refund from the state
general fund for that amount in excess of four percent of the person'sindividual's
annual income, but the refund may not be in excess of four hundred dollars. If the
calculation for the refund is less than five dollars, a minimum of five dollars must
be sent to the qualifying applicant.
c. PersonsIndividuals who reside together, as spouses or when one or more is a
dependent of another, are entitled to only one refund between or among them
under this subsection. PersonsIndividuals who reside together in a rental unit,
who are not spouses or dependents, are each entitled to apply for a refund based
on the rent paid by that personindividual.
d. Any individual claiming the refund under this section shall sign a verified
statement of facts establishing the individual's eligibility. Each application for
refund under this subsection must be made to the tax commissioner before the
first day of June of each year by the personindividual claiming the refund. Any
income information contained in the statement of facts is a confidential record.
Page No. 6 25.0789.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
The tax commissioner may grant an extension of time to file an application for
good cause. The tax commissioner shall issue refunds to applicants.
e. This subsection does not apply to rents or fees paid by a personan individual for
any living quarters, including a nursing home licensed pursuant to section
23-16-01, if those living quarters are exempt from property taxation and the
owner is not making a payment in lieu of property taxes.
f. A personAn individual may not receive a refund under this section for a taxable
year in which that personindividual received an exemptiona valuation reduction
under subsection 1 section 7 of this Ac t.
3.2. All forms necessary to effectuate this section must be prescribed, designed, and made
available by the tax commissioner. The county directors of tax equalization shall make
these forms available upon request.
4. A person
3. An individual whose homestead is a farm structure exempt from taxation under
subsection 15 of section 57-02-08 may not receive any property tax credit under this
section.
5.4. For the purposes of this section:
a. "Dependent" has the same meaning it has for federal income tax purposes.
b. "Homestead" has the same meaning as provided in section 47-18-01.
c. "Income" means income for the most recent complete taxable year from all
sources, including the income of any dependent of the applicant, and including
any county, state, or federal public assistance benefits, social security, or other
retirement benefits, but excluding any federal rent subsidy, any amount excluded
from income by federal or state law with the exception of income from social
security benefits, and medical expenses paid during the year by the applicant or
the applicant's dependent which is not compensated by insurance or other
means.
d.c. "Medical expenses" has the same meaning as it has for state income tax
purposes, except that for transportation for medical care the personindividual
may use the standard mileage rate allowed for state officer and employee use of
a motor vehicle under section 54-06-09.
Page No. 7 25.0789.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
e.d. "Permanently and totally disabled" means the inability to engage in any
substantial gainful activity by reason of any medically determinable physical or
mental impairment which can be expected to result in death or has lasted or can
be expected to last for a continuous period of not less than twelve months as
established by a certificate from a licensed physician or a written determination of
disability from the social security administration or any federal or state agency
that has authority to certify an individual's disability.
e. "Rental homestead" means a homestead as described in section 47 - 18 - 01 ,
except for the fact that the individual rents living quarters.
SECTION 5. AMENDMENT. Section 57-02-08.3 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
57-02-08.3. Homestead credit for special assessments - Certification - Lien.
1. Any person who has qualified for the property tax credit provided for in section
57-02-08.1 An individual who is sixty - five years of age or older or permanently and
totally disabled with an income not in excess of seventy thousand dollars may elect to
also qualify for an additional homesteada credit against that person'sindividual's
homestead for the portion of any special assessment levied by a taxing district which
becomes due for the same year.
2. The total amount of credits allowed for any one property must not exceed six thousand
dollars, adjusted annually on January first of each year after December 31, 2019, by
the consumer price index, excluding any interest charged by the body levying the
special assessment.
3. This credit may be granted only at the election of the qualifying personindividual. The
personindividual making the election shall do so by filing with the county auditor a
claim for the special assessment credit on a form prescribed by the tax commissioner.
The claim must be filed with the county auditor on or before February first of the year
in which the special assessment installment thereof becomes payable.
4. For purposes of this subsection, "consumer:
a. "Consumer price index" means the percentage change in the consumer price
index for all urban consumers in the midwest region as determined by the United
Page No. 8 25.0789.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
States department of labor, bureau of labor statistics, for the most recent year
ending December thirty-first.
b. "Dependent" has the same meaning it has for federal income tax purposes.
c. "Homestead" means a homestead as described in section 47 - 18 - 01 .
d. "Income" means income for the most recent complete taxable year from all
sources, including the income of any dependent of the applicant, and including
any county, state, or federal public assistance benefits, social security, or other
retirement benefits, but excluding any federal rent subsidy, any amount excluded
from income by federal or state law with the exception of income from social
security benefits, and medical expenses paid during the year by the applicant or
the applicant's dependent which is not compensated by insurance or other
means.
e. "Medical expenses" has the same meaning as it has for state income tax
purposes, except that for transportation for medical care the individual may use
the standard mileage rate allowed for state officer and employee use of a motor
vehicle under section 54 - 06 - 09 .
f. "Permanently and totally disabled" means the inability to engage in any
substantial gainful activity by reason of any medically determinable physical or
mental impairment which can be expected to result in death or has lasted or can
be expected to last for a continuous period of not less than twelve months as
established by a certificate from a licensed physician or a written determination of
disability from the social security administration or any federal or state agency
that has authority to certify an individual's disability.
2.5. a. By March first of each year, the county auditor of each county shall certify to the
state tax commissioner, on forms prescribed by the tax commissioner, the
following information:
(1) The name and address of each personindividual for whom the special
assessment credit provided for in subsection 1 was allowed for the
preceding year.
(2) The amount of credit allowed for the special assessment installment thereof
due for the preceding year.
Page No. 9 25.0789.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
(3) The total amount of the special assessment credits due in each special
assessment district.
(4) Other information that the tax commissioner requires.
b. The tax commissioner shall audit the certifications, make such corrections as
may be required, and certify to the state treasurer for payment to each county by
June first of each year the sum of the amounts computed by adding the credits
allowed for portions of special assessments which were due for each homestead
in the county for the preceding year. No more than the portion of special
assessments due for the preceding year shall be allowed as a credit for any
homestead in any year.
c. The county treasurer upon receipt of the payment from the state treasurer shall
forthwith apportion and distribute the payment to each special assessment district
in the county according to the total credits allowed for each respective special
assessment district.
d. Supplemental certifications by the county auditor and by the state tax
commissioner and supplemental payments by the state treasurer may be made
after the dates prescribed herein to make such corrections as may be necessary
because of errors therein.
3.6. a. Any credit allowed under subsection 1, plus interest in the amount of six percent
per year from June first of the year for which the special assessment installment
for which a credit is taken becomes payable, creates a lien in favor of the state
against the property upon which the special assessment credit is allowed and
remains a lien upon the property from the time the credit is allowed until the lien
is fully satisfied by depositing the amount of the lien in the state general fund. If
the amount of the lien exceeds the market value of the property, the state may
accept the amount of the market value of the property as payment in full on the
lien.
b. (1) Except as otherwise provided in this subdivision, a transfer of title to the
homestead because of sale, death, or otherwise may not be made without
the lien being satisfied. When a credit under subsection 1 is allowed, the
Page No. 10 25.0789.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
county auditor shall cause a notice of lien of record to be filed against
subject property with the recorder.
(2) The recorder may not record any deed for property on which the county
auditor has determined that there is an unsatisfied lien created under this
section, except for a transfer between spouses because of the death of one
of them as provided in paragraph 3.
(3) When a transfer occurs between spouses because of the death of one of
them, the lien allowed by this section need not be satisfied until the property
is again transferred.
c. This lien has precedence over all other liens except general tax liens and prior
special assessment liens and shall not be divested at any judicial sale. A mistake
in the description of the property covered by this lien or in the name of the owner
of the property does not defeat the lien if the property can be identified by the
description in the special assessment list.
SECTION 6. AMENDMENT. Section 57-02-08.9 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
57-02-08.9. Primary residence credit - Qualification - Application. (Effective for the
first two taxable years beginning afterthrough December 31, 20232026)
1. An individualFor taxable year 2024:
a. A taxpayer that has not previously received a credit under this section is entitled
to a credit of five hundred dollars against the property tax due on the
individual'staxpayer's primary residence. The credit may not exceed the amount
of property tax due. The credit must be applied to reduce the property tax owed
on the individual'staxpayer's primary residence after other exemptions or credits
under this chapter have been applied.
2. b. For purposes of this section, "primary:
(1) "Owned" means an individual holds a present ownership interest, including
ownership in fee simple, holds a present life estate or other terminable
present ownership interest, holds a beneficial interest in a qualifying trust, or
is a purchaser under a contract for deed. The term does not include a mere
right of occupancy or a tenancy under a lease.
Page No. 11 25.0789.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
(2) (a) "Primary residence" means a dwelling in this state owned and
occupied by an individual as that individual's primary place of
residence and includes residences taxed under chapter 57-55,
including the land, appurtenances, and improvements used in the
residential occupancy of the dwelling, that, subject to subparagraph b
and subdivision c, is :
[1] Owned by one or more individuals, directly, through a beneficial
interest in a qualifying trust, or through an ownership interest in a
corporation or passthrough entity;
[2] Designed or adapted for human residence;
[3] Used as a residence; and
[4] Occupied as a primary place of residence by an owner, by an
owner's surviving spouse who has a life estate in the property, or,
for property owned through a beneficial interest in a qualifying
trust, by a trustor or beneficiary of the trust who qualifies for the
credit.
(b) For purposes of the term:
[1] An individual may not have more than one primary residence.
[2] A primary residence includes a primary residence taxed under
chapter 57 - 55 .
(3) "Qualifying trust" means a trust:
(a) In which the agreement, will, or court order creating the trust, an
instrument transferring property to the trust, or any other agreement
that is binding on the trustee provides that the trustor of the trust or a
beneficiary of the trust has the right to use and occupy as the trustor's
or beneficiary's primary residence rent free and without charge except
for taxes and other costs and expenses specified in the instrument or
court order:
[1] For life;
[2] For the lesser of life or a term of years; or
Page No. 12 25.0789.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
[3] Until the date the trust is revoked or terminated by an instrument
or court order that describes the property with sufficient certainty
to identify it and is recorded in the real property records of the
county in which the property is located; and
(b) That acquires the property in an instrument of title or under a court
order that:
[1] Describes the property with sufficient certainty to identify it and
the interest acquired; and
[2] Is recorded in the real property records of the county in which the
property is located.
(4) "Trustor" means an individual who transfers an interest in real or personal
property to a qualifying trust, whether during the individual's lifetime or at
death, or the individual's spouse .
3.c. An individual who does not reside in the primary residence in this state is eligible
for the credit under this section if the individual's absence is due to confinement
in a nursing home, hospital, or other care facility, for as long as that confinement
lasts and the portion of the primary residence previously occupied by the
individual is not rented to another individualperson.
4.d. Only one credit under this section may be applied against the property taxes
levied against any primary residence.
5.e. An individual whose primary residence is a farm structure exempt from taxation
under subsection 15 of section 57-02-08 is not eligible for a credit under this
section.
6.f. The credit may not reduce the liability for special assessments levied upon any
property.
7.g. To apply for a credit under this section, an applicant shall sign and file with the
tax commissioner, by April first of each year, an application containing a verified
statement of facts establishing the applicant's eligibility as of the date of the claim
on a form and in the manner prescribed by the tax commissioner.
Page No. 13 25.0789.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
8.h. The tax commissioner, in consultation with the county auditors, shall prescribe,
design, and make available all forms necessary to effectuate this section. The tax
commissioner shall make these forms available upon request.
2. The credit under subsection 1 may not be claimed for taxable years after taxable year
2024, except to the extent the credit may be claimed retroactively as provided in this
subsection. A taxpayer who, regardless of the application requirements and deadlines
under subsection 1, qualifies for a credit under subsection 1 against taxes levied in
taxable year 2024 may file an abatement claim to receive a refund of taxes paid equal
to the amount of the credit allowed under subsection 1. Supplemental certifications by
the county auditor and the tax commissioner and supplemental payments by the state
treasurer shall be made and distributed according to the procedures provided under
section 57 - 02 - 08.10, as it existed on July 1, 2025, and may be made after the dates
prescribed in section 57 - 02 - 08.10, as it existed on July 1, 2025 .
SECTION 7. AMENDMENT. Section 57-02-08.10 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
57-02-08.10. Primary residence credit - Certification - Distribution. (Effective through
June 30, 2026 August 1, 2025 )
1. By June first of each year June 1, 2025 , the tax commissioner shall:
a. Review the applications received under section 57-02-08.9, as it existed on
December 31, 2024 , and determine which applicants qualify for the credit allowed
under section 57-02-08.9 , as it existed on December 31, 2024 ; and
b. Provide to each county auditor:
(1) A copy of each approved application under subdivision a which identifies a
primary residence located in the county; and
(2) The sum of the credits allowed under section 57-02-08.9, as it existed on
December 31, 2024 , in the county for the current taxable year.
2. The county auditor shall apply the credit under section 57-02-08.9, as it existed on
December 31, 2024 , to each primary residence identified by the tax commissioner as
a qualifying primary residence on the corresponding property tax statement.
3. By January first of each year, the county auditor shall certify to the tax commissioner
the sum of the credits approved by the tax commissioner under subsection 1 which
Page No. 14 25.0789.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
were applied toward property taxes owed on primary residences in the county for the
preceding year.
4. By June first of each year after 2024June 1, 2025, the tax commissioner shall review a
sampling of information provided by the county auditor to verify the accuracy of the
application of the credit and certify to the state treasurer for payment to each county
the aggregate dollar amount of credits allowed under section 57-02-08.9, as it existed
on December 31, 2024 , in each county for the preceding year.
5.4. Within fourteen days of receiving the payment from the state treasurer, but no later
than June thirtieth of each year after 2024June 30, 2025, the county treasurer shall
apportion and distribute the payment to the county and to the taxing districts of the
county on the same basis as property taxes for the preceding year were apportioned
and distributed.
6.5. Supplemental certifications by the county auditor and the tax commissioner and
supplemental payments by the state treasurer may be made after the dates prescribed
in this section to make corrections necessary because of errors.
7.6. The county auditors shall provide information requested by the tax commissioner to
effectuate this section.
8.7. The tax commissioner shall prescribe, design, and make available all forms necessary
to effectuate this section.
SECTION 8. A new section to chapter 57-02 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
Primary residence valuation reduction - Qualification - Application - Certification -
State reimbursement.
1. An individual is entitled to a reduction of one hundred percent of the taxable valuation
of the individual's primary residence up to a maximum reduction of nine thousand
dollars of taxable valuation as provided in this section. The reduction under this
section applies to a primary residence taxed as a mobile home under chapter 57 - 55 .
2. A dwelling does not lose its character as a primary residence if the owner of the
dwelling does not reside in the primary residence because the individual is confined in
a nursing home, hospital, or other care facility, for as long as that confinement lasts
Page No. 15 25.0789.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
and the portion of the primary residence previously occupied by the individual is not
rented to another individual.
3. Individuals residing together who are co - owners of the property but who are no t
spouses or dependents each are entitled to a percentage of a full reduction under
subsection 1 equal to their ownership interests in the property .
4. To apply for the reduction under this section, an owner shall sign and file with the tax
commissioner an application containing a verified statement of facts establishing the
owner's property meets the eligibility requirements to be considered a primary
residence under this section as of the date of the application on a form and in the
manner prescribed by the tax commissione r .
a. An application must be filed by Augus t 1, 2025, to request a primary residence
valuation reduction for:
(1) Taxable year 2025 for a primary residence taxed as real estate under this
title.
(2) Taxable years 2025 and 2026 for a primary residence taxed as a mobile
home under chapter 57 - 55 .
b. For primary residence valuation reductions after 2025 for a primary residence
taxed as real estate under this title and primary residence valuation reductions
after 2026 for a primary residence taxed as a mobile home under chapter 57 - 55 ,
an application must be filed by August first of each year to request a reduction
under this section beginning:
(1) The taxable year during which the application is filed for a primary residence
taxed as real estate under this title.
(2) The taxable year succeeding the taxable year during which the application
is filed for a primary residence taxed as a mobile home under chapter
57 - 55 .
c. By October 1, 2025, the tax commissioner shall :
(1) Review the applications received under subdivision a and determine which
applications qualify for the reduction under this section; and
Page No. 16 25.0789.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
(2) Provide to each county director of tax equalization a copy of each approved
or rejected application received under subdivision a which identifies property
located in the county.
d. By October first of each year after 2025, the tax commissioner shall:
(1) Review the applications received under subdivision b and determine which
applicants qualify for the reduction under this section; and
(2) Provide to each county director of tax equalization a copy of each approved
or rejected application received under subdivision b which identifies property
located in the county .
e. The county director of tax equalization shall a ttach each application approved
under this subsection to the assessment list and list the amount of the reduction
on the assessment list.
f. The tax department may request additional documentation from the applicant
when making the determination of eligibility.
g. If any claimant is found to have claimed a reduction fraudulently under this
section to which that claimant is not entitled, all reductions under this section for
that claimant for that taxable year must be canceled. If a claimant received a
reduction that is canceled under this section, the auditor of the county in which
the property is located shall enter the amount of the canceled reduction as
omitted property on the assessment list of property that has escaped taxation.
h. Determinations of eligibility for a reduction under this section may be appealed
through the equalization and abatement process.
5. a. For taxable year 2025:
(1) The county auditor shall apply the reduction under this section to each
primary residence taxed as real estate under this title and identified as a
qualifying primary residence on the corresponding tax statement.
(2) The county auditor shall consider an application received under
subsection 4 for a primary residence taxed as a mobile home under chapter
57 - 55 and identified by the tax commissioner as a primary residence eligible
for the reduction under this section as an application for an abatement and
refund of taxes in an amount consistent with the reduction allowed. The
Page No. 17 25.0789.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
county auditor shall present the application for abatement and refund of
taxes to the board of county commissioners at its next regular meeting. The
county commissioners shall approve the applications filed under this
paragraph as soon as practicable and refunds must be issued without delay
according to the procedures in section 57 - 23 - 09. The application, notice ,
and hearing requirements and procedures under chapter 57 - 23 and
sections 57 - 55 - 04.1 and 57 - 55 - 12 do not apply to an application for
abatement and refund filed under this paragraph.
b. For taxable years after 2025, the county auditor shall apply the reduction under
this section to each primary residence identified as a qualifying primary residence
on the corresponding property tax statement or mobile home tax statement.
6. A reduction under this section is valid for the entire taxable year for which the claim
was approved, without regard to any change of ownership of the property which
occurs a f ter the claim was approved for the taxable yea r .
7. This section does not reduce the liability of any individual for special assessments
levied upon any property.
8. A reduction of taxable valuation under this section may not be applied to reduce the
taxable valuation used for purposes of determining the amount subtracted from a
school district's state aid payment under subdivision a of subsection 4 of section
15.1 - 27 - 04.1 .
9. The tax commissioner shall prescribe, design, and make available all forms necessary
to effectuate this section. Application forms must include the full name and address of
the applicant and any other information prescribed by the tax commissioner. The
county director of tax equalization shall make these forms available to applicants upon
request.
10. For purposes of this section:
a. "Owned" means an individual holds a present ownership interest, including
ownership in fee simple, holds a present life estate or other terminable present
ownership interest, holds a beneficial interest in a qualifying trust, or is a
purchaser under a contract for deed. The term does not include a mere right of
occupancy or a tenancy under a lease.
Page No. 18 25.0789.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
b. (1) "Primary residence" means a dwelling in this state, including the land ,
appurtenances, and improvements used in the residential occupancy of the
dwelling , which is not exempt from property taxes as a farm residence and ,
subject to subsection 2 and paragraph 2, is :
(a) Owned by one or more individuals, either directly or through a
beneficial interest in a qualifying trust;
(b) Designed or adapted for human residence;
(c) Used as a residence; and
(d) Occupied as a primary place of residence by an owner, an individual
who has a life estate in the property, or, for property owned through a
beneficial interest in a qualifying trust, by a trustor or beneficiary of the
trust who qualifies for the reduction.
(2) For purposes of the term:
(a) An individual may not have more than one primary residence.
(b) A primary residence includes a primary residence taxed as a mobile
home under chapter 57 - 55 .
c. "Qualifying trust" means a trust:
(1) In which the agreement, will, or court order creating the trust, an instrumen t
transferring property to the trust, or any other agreement that is binding on
the trustee provides that the trustor of the trust or a beneficiary of the trus t
has the right to use and occupy as the trustor's or beneficiary's primary
residence rent free and without charge except for taxes and other costs and
expenses specified in the instrument or court order:
(a) For life;
(b) For the lesser of life or a term of years; or
(c) Until the date the trust is revoked or terminated by an instrument or
court order that describes the property with sufficient certainty to
identify it and is recorded in the real property records of the county in
which the property is located; and
(2) That acquires the property in an instrument of title or under a court order
that:
Page No. 19 25.0789.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
(a) Describes the property with sufficient certainty to identify it and the
interest acquired; and
(b) Is recorded in the real property records of the county in which the
property is located.
d. "Trustor" means an individual who transfers an interest in real or personal
property to a qualifying trust, whether during the individual's lifetime or at death,
or the individual's spouse.
11. a. Before January 15, 2026, the county auditor of each county shall certify to the tax
commissioner, on forms prescribed by the tax commissioner the following
information applicable to taxable year 2025 for primary residences taxed as real
estate under this title and taxable years 2025 and 2026 for primary residences
taxed as a mobile home under chapter 57 - 55 :
(1) The full name, address, and social security or taxpayer identification number
of each individual or entity for whom the reduction under this section was
allowed;
(2) The legal description of the property;
(3) The taxable value of the property;
(4) The dollar amount of each reduction in taxable value allowed;
(5) The total of the tax mill rates used to calculate taxes for the corresponding
year of all taxing districts in which the property was contained, exclusive of
any state mill rates; and
(6) Any other information prescribed by the tax commissioner.
b. Before January fifteenth of each year after 2026, the county auditor of each
county shall certify to the tax commissioner, on forms prescribed by the tax
commissioner the following information applicable to the taxable year during
which the application is filed for a primary residence taxed as real estate under
this title and the taxable year succeeding the taxable year during which the
application is filed for a primary residence taxed as a mobile home under chapter
57 - 55 :
Page No. 20 25.0789.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
(1) The full name, address, and social security or taxpayer identification number
of each individual or entity for whom the reduction under this section was
allowed for the corresponding taxable year;
(2) The legal description of the property;
(3) The taxable value of the property;
(4) The dollar amount of each reduction in taxable value allowed;
(5) The total of the tax mill rates used to calculate taxes for the corresponding
year of all taxing districts in which the property was contained, exclusive of
any state mill rates; and
(6) Any other information prescribed by the tax commissioner.
12. a. By March 15, 2026, the tax commissioner shall :
(1) Review the certifications under subdivision a of subsection 11, make any
required corrections, and certify to the state treasurer for payment to each
county the sum of the amounts computed by:
(a) For primary residence valuation reductions for primary residences
taxed as real estate for taxable year 2025, m ultiplying the reduction
allowed for each qualifying primary residence taxed as real estate
under this title in the county for taxable year 2025 by the total of the
tax mill rates for taxable year 2025 of all taxing districts in which the
property was located.
(b) For primary residence valuation reductions for primary residences
taxed as mobile homes under chapter 57 - 55 for taxable year 2025 ,
m ultiplying the reduction allowed for each qualifying primary residence
taxed as a mobile home under chapter 57 - 55 in the county for taxable
year 2025 by the total of the tax mill rates used to calculate mobile
home taxes under chapter 57 - 55 in taxable year 2025 of all taxing
districts in which the property was located.
(c) For primary residence valuation reductions for primary residences
taxed as mobile homes under chapter 57 - 55 for taxable year 2026 ,
m ultiplying the reduction allowed for each qualifying primary residence
taxed as a mobile home under chapter 57 - 55 in the county for taxable
Page No. 21 25.0789.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
year 2026 by the total of the tax mill rates used to calculate mobile
home taxes under chapter 57 - 55 in taxable year 2026 of all taxing
districts in which the property was located.
(2) Certify to the state treasurer for deposit in the state medical center fund the
amount computed by multiplying one mill times the reduction allowed under
this section for primary residences taxed as rea l estate for taxable year
2025 and m obile homes under chapter 57 - 55 for taxable years 2025 and
2026.
b. By March fifteenth of each year after 2026, the tax commissioner shall:
(1) Review the certifications under subdivision b of subsection 11, make any
required corrections, and certify to the state treasurer for payment to each
county the sum of the amounts computed by:
(a) Multiplying the reduction allowed for each qualifying primary residence
taxed as real estate under this title in the county for the preceding
year by the total of the tax mill rates for the preceding year of all
taxing districts in which the property was located.
(b) Multiplying the reduction allowed for each qualifying primary residence
taxed as as a mobile home under chapter 57 - 55 in the county for the
current year by the total of the tax mill rates used to calculate mobile
home taxes under chapter 57 - 55 for the current taxable year of al l
taxing districts in which the property was located.
(2) Certify annually to the state treasurer for deposit in the state medical center
fund the amount computed by multiplying one mill times the reduction
allowed under this section for all eligible primary residences in the state for:
(a) The taxable year during which the application is filed for a primary
residence taxed as real estate under this title.
(b) The taxable year succeeding the taxable year during which the
application is filed for a primary residence taxed as a mobile home
under chapter 57 - 55 .
c. In reviewing certifications, the tax commissioner may refer to any income tax
return information or other information available to the tax commissioner.
Page No. 22 25.0789.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
13. Within fourteen days of receiving the payment from the state treasurer, the county
treasurer shall apportion and distribute the payment without delay to the county and to
the taxing districts of the county on the same basis property taxes under this chapter
and mobile home taxes under chapter 57 - 55 were apportioned and distributed for the
taxable year in which the taxes were levied.
14. Supplemental certifications by the county auditor and the tax commissioner and
supplemental payments by the state treasurer may be made after the dates prescribed
in this section to make any corrections necessary because of errors or approval of any
application for equalization or abatement filed by an individual or entity because all or
part of the reduction under this section was not allowed.
SECTION 9. AMENDMENT. Section 57-02-11.1 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
57-02-11.1. Townhouses - Common areas - Assessment and taxation.
Townhouse property must be classified and valued as is other property except that the
value of the townhouse property must be increased by the value added by the right to use any
common areas in connection with the townhouse development. The common areas of the
development may not be separately taxed. The value of a common area of the townhouse
development must be assessed in an equal amount to each townhouse in the development
unless a declaration setting out a different apportionment is recorded in the office of the county
recorder. The total value of the townhouse property, including the value added as provided
herein, must have the benefit of any homestead credit under section 57-02-08.1 or other special
classification if the townhouse otherwise qualifies.
SECTION 10. AMENDMENT. Subsection 1 of section 57-23-06 of the North Dakota
Century Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
1. Within ten days after receiving an application for abatement, the city auditor or the
township clerk shall give the applicant a notice of a hearing to be held before the
governing body of the city or township, or such other committee as it may designate, in
which the assessed property is located. SaidThe hearing must be set for no more than
sixty days after the date of the notice of hearing, and in any event, must be held
before the recommendations provided for in subsection 2 are made. The applicant
may waive, in writing, the hearing before suchthe governing body or designated
Page No. 23 25.0789.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
committee at any time before the hearing. Any recommendations provided for in
subsection 2 must be transmitted to the county auditor no more than thirty days after
the date set for the hearing. The provisions of this subsection do not apply to
applications for abatement pursuant to section 57-02-08.2.
SECTION 11. AMENDMENT. Section 57-55-10 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
57-55-10. Exemptions - Exceptions.
1. A mobile home described in this subsection to the extent herein limited is exempt from
taxation under this chapter; provided, that the mobile home shall have a tax permit as
provided in section 57-55-06:
a. If it is owned and used as living quarters of a military personindividual on active
military duty in this state who is a resident of another state.
b. If it is owned and occupied by a welfare recipient, provided the mobile home is
not permanently attached to the land and classified as real property. For the
purposes of this subdivision, "welfare recipient" means any personindividual who
is certified to the county director of tax equalization by the human service zone as
receiving the major portion of income from any state or federal public assistance
program.
c. If it is owned and used as living quarters by a disabled veteran or unremarried
surviving spouse who meets the requirements of subsection 20 of section
57-02-08 or section 57-02-08.8.
d. If it is owned and used as living quarters by a permanently and totally disabled
personindividual or unremarried surviving spouse who meets the requirements of
subsection 20 of section 57-02-08.
e.d. If it is owned and used as the living quarters for a blind personindividual who
meets the requirements of subsection 22 of section 57-02-08.
f.e. If it is owned and used by a personan individual who uses it as living quarters
and who qualifies for the homestead creditprimary residence valuation reduction
provided in section 57-02-08.1 section 8 of this Ac t, and the mobile home shall be
regarded for the purposes of this exemption as the homesteadprimary residence
of the personindividual claiming the exemption.
Page No. 24 25.0789.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
2. This chapter does not apply to a mobile home that:
a. Is used only for the temporary living quarters of the owner or other occupant
while the personindividual is engaged in recreational or vacation activities,
provided the unit:
(1) Displays a current travel trailer license; or
(2) Is a park model trailer that is used only for seasonal or recreational living
quarters and not as a primary residence, and which is located in a trailer
park or campground, and for which the owner has paid a park model trailer
fee under section 39-18-03.2. For purposes of this paragraph, "park model"
trailer means a recreational vehicle not exceeding forty feet [12.19 meters]
in length which is primarily designed to provide temporary living quarters for
recreation, camping, or seasonal use, is built on a single chassis, is
mounted on wheels, has a gross trailer area not exceeding four hundred
square feet [37.16 square meters] of enclosed living space in the setup
mode, and is certified by the manufacturer as complying with American
national standards institute standard A119.5.
b. Qualifies as a farm residence as described by subsection 15 of section 57-02-08,
provided suchthe mobile home is permanently attached to a foundation.
c. Is permanently attached to a foundation and is assessed as real property,
provided the owner of suchthe mobile home also owns the land on which suchthe
mobile home is located or is in possession of the real property under the terms of
a lease in recordable form which has a term that continues for at least twenty
years after the date of execution with the consent of the lessor of the real
property.
d. Is owned by a licensed mobile home dealer who holds suchthe mobile home
solely for the purpose of resale, and provided that suchthe mobile home is not
used as living quarters or as the place for the conducting of any business.
SECTION 12. REPEAL. Sections 57-02-08.2 and 57-02-08.8 of the North Dakota Century
Code are repealed.
SECTION 13. RETROACTIVE APPLICATION. Section 6 of this Act applies retroactively as
provided in subsection 2 of section 57-02-08.9.
Page No. 25 25.0789.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
SECTION 14. EFFECTIVE DATE. Sections 3, 4, 5, 6, 8, 9, 11, and 12 of this Act are
effective for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2024.
Page No. 26 25.0789.01000